Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1602
SPF Accredited; advertisement; subject to sections.

Every person, partnership, limited liability company, firm, association, or corporation which issues, uses, or circulates any certificate, advertisement, tag, seal, poster, letterhead, marking, circular, or written or printed representation or description of or pertaining to SPF swine intended for propagation or sale or sold or offered for sale in which the words SPF Accredited, Nebraska SPF Accredited, or similar words or phrases are used or employed or in which are used or employed signs, symbols, maps, diagrams, pictures, words, or phrases expressly or impliedly stating or representing that such SPF swine comply with or conform to the standards or requirements recommended or approved by the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources or by any legal entity or organization designated by such institute shall be subject to the provisions of sections 54-1601 to 54-1605.

Laws 1967, c. 338, § 2, p. 905;

Laws 1969, c. 457, § 1, p. 1552;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 38;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 343.